Washington statutes.
RCW 41.50.075

Funds established.

(1) Two funds are hereby created and established in the state treasury to be known as the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 1 retirement fund, and the Washington law enforcement officers' and firefighters' system plan 2 retirement fund which shall consist of all moneys paid into them in accordance with the provisions of this chapter and chapter 41.26 RCW, whether such moneys take the form of cash, securities, or other assets. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 1, and the plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the law enforcement officers' and firefighters' retirement system plan 2.

(2) All of the assets of the Washington state teachers' retirement system shall be credited according to the purposes for which they are held, to two funds to be maintained in the state treasury, namely, the teachers' retirement system plan 1 fund and the teachers' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the Washington state teachers' retirement system plan 2 and 3.

(3) There is hereby established in the state treasury two separate funds, namely the public employees' retirement system plan 1 fund and the public employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund. The plan 1 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plan 1, and the combined plan 2 and plan 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public employees' retirement system plans 2 and 3.

(4) There is hereby established in the state treasury the school employees' retirement system combined plan 2 and 3 fund. The combined plan 2 and 3 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the school employees' retirement system plan 2 and plan 3.

(5) There is hereby established in the state treasury the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2 fund. The plan 2 fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of the public safety employees' retirement system plan 2.

(6)(a)(i) There is hereby established in the state treasury the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. The higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund shall consist of all moneys paid to finance the benefits provided to members of each of the higher education retirement plans.

(ii) The fund in this subsection (6) was originally created under chapter 47, Laws of 2011 1st sp. sess. (Engrossed Substitute House Bill No. 1981).

(b) The office of financial management must create individual accounts for each institution of higher education within the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund. For fiscal year 2021, the office of financial management must transfer all the assets of the higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund into the individual accounts for each institution that will be used to manage the accounting for each benefit plan. The higher education retirement plan supplemental benefit fund will include all the amounts in the individual accounts created in this subsection.

[ 2020 c 103 s 5; 2004 c 242 s 44; 2000 c 247 s 601; 1998 c 341 s 503; 1996 c 39 s 16; 1995 c 239 s 312; 1991 c 35 s 108.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2020 c 103: See notes following RCW 28B.10.423.

Effective date—2004 c 242: See RCW 41.37.901.

Effective dates—Subchapter headings not law—2000 c 247: See RCW 41.40.931 and 41.40.932.

Effective date—1998 c 341: See RCW 41.35.901.

Effective dates—1996 c 39: See note following RCW 41.32.010.

Intent—Purpose—1995 c 239: See note following RCW 41.32.831.

Effective date—Part and subchapter headings not law—1995 c 239: See notes following RCW 41.32.005.

Intent—1991 c 35: See note following RCW 41.26.005.

Benefits not contractual right until date specified: RCW 41.34.100.